District of Columbia statutes.
16-1505

Conclusiveness of judgment.

A judgment of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia in a proceeding pursuant to this chapter is not a bar to any afteraction brought by either party, and does not conclude any question of title between them, where title is not pleaded by the defendants.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 582, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 560, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(g)(1)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1505.
1973 Ed., § 16-1505.